apertium-ckb.ckb.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%> ! Noun
%<nom%> ! Nominative
%<pl%> ! Plural

LEXICON Root
Prefixes;
NounStems ;

LEXICON NounStems

ﻡﺭۆڤ  Ninfl ; ! "person"
ﺩەﺭیﺍ Ninfl ; ! "sea"

LEXICON Ninfl

%<n%>: # ;

LEXICON Prefixes  ! Modal/polarity prefixes, pronominal clitics

%<pri%>:ﺩە PrefClt ; ! usually present indicative

LEXICON PrefClt 

من%<prn%>%<pers%>%<clt%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:م VerbRoot; ! p1sg clitic

LEXICON VerbRoot

ویستن%<vblex%>%<tv%>%<pri%>:ەﻭێ # ; !wîstin - want
 
